District of Columbia statutes.
9-1115.01

Authority to enter into Compact.

The Mayor is hereby authorized to execute, on behalf of the District of Columbia, the Woodrow Wilson Bridge and Tunnel Compact (“Compact”) with the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland, which Compact shall be as it appears in § 9-1115.03.

History

Feb. 28, 1996, D.C. Law 11-96, § 2, 42 DCR 7185

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1115.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2481.